Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7983.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares that reasonable term limits promote public
confidence in government, encourage civic participation, create opportunities for new leadership,
and preserve institutional knowledge while preventing the concentration of political power.
It is the intent of this act to limit service in each chamber of the general assembly to twelve
(12) years, prospectively, beginning on the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2. Title 22 of the General Laws entitled "GENERAL ASSEMBLY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 20
TERM LIMITS FOR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
22-20-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Term Limits for Members of the
General Assembly”.
22-20-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following word and term shall have the following meaning
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:
(1) “Years of service” or “service” means the years served in a respective chamber of the
general assembly as an elected official, whether consecutive or nonconsecutive.

22-20-3. Term limits for members of the general assembly.
(a) No person shall serve more than twelve (12) years in the house of representatives, and
no person shall serve more than twelve (12) years in the senate.
(b) Any partial term exceeding one year shall count as one year toward the twelve (12) year
limitation. Any partial term of one year or less shall not be counted.
(c) Service in the house of representatives shall be counted separately from service in the
senate, and service in the senate shall be counted separately from service in the house of
representatives. A person who has reached the twelve (12) year limitation in one chamber may seek
election to the other chamber, subject to the same twelve (12) year limitation applicable to that
chamber.
22-20-4. Prospective application.
(a) The twelve (12) year limitation established by this chapter shall apply only to service
occurring on or after the effective date of this chapter.
(b) No service completed prior to the effective date of this chapter shall be counted toward
the twelve (12) year term limitation.
22-20-5. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, that judgment shall not
affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation to
the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that
judgment shall have been rendered.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005772
========
LC005772 - Page 2 of 3